Maryland, session 2025, HB1150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–810.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DISSEMINATE” MEANS TO PUBLISH, POST, OR OTHERWISE
DISCLOSE INFORMATION ON A PUBLIC INTERNET SITE OR ON A PUBLIC FORUM.
(3) “PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION” INCLUDES:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1150*

HOUSE BILL 1150
(I) NAME;
(II) ADDRESS;
(III) TELEPHONE NUMBER;
(IV) DRIVER’S LICENSE NUMBER;
(V) SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER;
(VI) PLACE OF EMPLOYMENT;
(VII) EMPLOYEE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(VIII) HEALTH INSURANCE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(IX) MEDICAL IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(X) MOTHER’S MAIDEN NAME;
(XI) BANK OR OTHER FINANCIAL INSTITUTION ACCOUNT
NUMBER;
(XII) DATE OF BIRTH;
(XIII) PERSONAL IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(XIV) UNIQUE BIOMETRIC DATA, INCLUDING FINGERPRINT,
VOICE PRINT, RETINA OR IRIS IMAGE, OR OTHER UNIQUE PHYSICAL
REPRESENTATION;
(XV) DIGITAL SIGNATURE;
(XVI) CREDIT CARD NUMBER OR OTHER PAYMENT DEVICE
NUMBER; OR
(XVII) SCHOOL ADDRESS.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY DISSEMINATE THE PERSONAL
IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OR IMAGES OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS UNDER THE AGE
OF 25 YEARS:
(1) WITHOUT EXPRESS PERMISSION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1150 3
(2) WITH THE INTENT TO INTIMIDATE OR HARM THE INDIVIDUAL.
(C) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED OR APPLIED IN A MANNER THAT
VIOLATES A PERSON’S RIGHTS TO FREEDOM OF SPEECH UNDER THE U.S.
CONSTITUTION OR THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS.
(D) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.